ctranslate-ol/frontend/dictionaries/dsb_DE.aff
FLAG num
SFX 397 Y 14
SFX 397 0 a .
SFX 397 0 e .
SFX 397 0 ego .
SFX 397 0 ej .
SFX 397 0 eje .
SFX 397 0 eju .
SFX 397 0 em .
SFX 397 0 emu .
SFX 397 0 i .
SFX 397 0 ich .
SFX 397 0 im .
SFX 397 0 ima .
SFX 397 0 imi .
SFX 397 0 u .
SFX 398 Y 19
SFX 398 0 a .
SFX 398 0 ach .
SFX 398 0 am .
SFX 398 0 ami .
SFX 398 0 oju .
SFX 398 0 om .
SFX 398 0 oma .
SFX 398 0 ow .
SFX 398 0 owu .
SFX 398 0 u .
SFX 398 0 y .
SFX 398 0 yjo .
SFX 398 0 yjom .
SFX 398 0 yjomej .
SFX 398 0 yjomy .
SFX 398 0 yjotej .
SFX 398 0 yjośo .
SFX 398 0 yjoš .
SFX 398 0 yju .
SFX 399 Y 19
SFX 399 0 a .
SFX 399 0 ach .
SFX 399 0 am .
SFX 399 0 ami .
SFX 399 0 o .
SFX 399 0 oju .
SFX 399 0 om .
SFX 399 0 oma .
SFX 399 0 ow .
SFX 399 0 owu .
SFX 399 0 u .
SFX 399 0 yjo .
SFX 399 0 yjom .
SFX 399 0 yjomej .
SFX 399 0 yjomy .
SFX 399 0 yjotej .
SFX 399 0 yjośo .
SFX 399 0 yjoš .
SFX 399 0 yju .
SFX 400 Y 20
SFX 400 0 a .
SFX 400 0 ach .
SFX 400 0 am .
SFX 400 0 ami .
SFX 400 0 i .
SFX 400 0 oju .
SFX 400 0 om .
SFX 400 0 oma .
SFX 400 0 ow .
SFX 400 0 owu .
SFX 400 0 u .
SFX 400 0 y .
SFX 400 0 yjo .
SFX 400 0 yjom .
SFX 400 0 yjomej .
SFX 400 0 yjomy .
SFX 400 0 yjotej .
SFX 400 0 yjośo .
SFX 400 0 yjoš .
SFX 400 0 yju .
SFX 401 Y 27
SFX 401 0 ach .
SFX 401 0 achmej .
SFX 401 0 achmy .
SFX 401 0 achu .
SFX 401 0 ašo .
SFX 401 0 aštej .
SFX 401 0 ašćo .
SFX 401 0 e .
SFX 401 0 i .
SFX 401 0 ijo .
SFX 401 0 ijom .
SFX 401 0 ijomej .
SFX 401 0 ijomy .
SFX 401 0 ijotej .
SFX 401 0 ijośo .
SFX 401 0 ijoš .
SFX 401 0 iju .
SFX 401 0 im .
SFX 401 0 imej .
SFX 401 0 imy .
SFX 401 0 itej .
SFX 401 0 iśo .
SFX 401 0 iš .
SFX 401 0 mej .
SFX 401 0 my .
SFX 401 0 tej .
SFX 401 0 ćo .
SFX 402 Y 23
SFX 402 0 a .
SFX 402 0 ach .
SFX 402 0 achmej .
SFX 402 0 achmy .
SFX 402 0 achu .
SFX 402 0 am .
SFX 402 0 ami .
SFX 402 0 ašo .
SFX 402 0 aštej .
SFX 402 0 ašćo .
SFX 402 0 e .
SFX 402 0 i .
SFX 402 0 o .
SFX 402 0 om .
SFX 402 0 oma .
SFX 402 0 omej .
SFX 402 0 omy .
SFX 402 0 otej .
SFX 402 0 ow .
SFX 402 0 owu .
SFX 402 0 ośo .
SFX 402 0 oš .
SFX 402 0 u .
SFX 403 Y 27
SFX 403 0 ach .
SFX 403 0 achmej .
SFX 403 0 achmy .
SFX 403 0 achu .
SFX 403 0 ašo .
SFX 403 0 aštej .
SFX 403 0 ašćo .
SFX 403 0 e .
SFX 403 0 i .
SFX 403 0 ijo .
SFX 403 0 ijom .
SFX 403 0 ijomej .
SFX 403 0 ijomy .
SFX 403 0 ijotej .
SFX 403 0 ijośo .
SFX 403 0 ijoš .
SFX 403 0 iju .
SFX 403 0 im .
SFX 403 0 imej .
SFX 403 0 imy .
SFX 403 0 itej .
SFX 403 0 iśo .
SFX 403 0 iš .
SFX 403 0 mej .
SFX 403 0 my .
SFX 403 0 tej .
SFX 403 0 śo .
SFX 404 Y 13
SFX 404 0 a .
SFX 404 0 ach .
SFX 404 0 am .
SFX 404 0 ami .
SFX 404 0 ich .
SFX 404 0 im .
SFX 404 0 ima .
SFX 404 0 imi .
SFX 404 0 oma .
SFX 404 0 ow .
SFX 404 0 owu .
SFX 404 0 u .
SFX 404 0 y .
SFX 405 Y 14
SFX 405 0 a .
SFX 405 0 ach .
SFX 405 0 am .
SFX 405 0 ami .
SFX 405 0 i .
SFX 405 0 ich .
SFX 405 0 im .
SFX 405 0 ima .
SFX 405 0 imi .
SFX 405 0 oma .
SFX 405 0 ow .
SFX 405 0 owu .
SFX 405 0 u .
SFX 405 0 y .
SFX 406 Y 15
SFX 406 0 a .
SFX 406 0 ach .
SFX 406 0 am .
SFX 406 0 ami .
SFX 406 0 ego .
SFX 406 0 em .
SFX 406 0 emu .
SFX 406 0 o .
SFX 406 0 oju .
SFX 406 0 om .
SFX 406 0 oma .
SFX 406 0 ow .
SFX 406 0 owu .
SFX 406 0 u .
SFX 406 0 y .
SFX 407 Y 14
SFX 407 0 a .
SFX 407 0 e .
SFX 407 0 ej .
SFX 407 0 eje .
SFX 407 0 eju .
SFX 407 0 ich .
SFX 407 0 im .
SFX 407 0 ima .
SFX 407 0 imi .
SFX 407 0 o .
SFX 407 0 ogo .
SFX 407 0 om .
SFX 407 0 omu .
SFX 407 0 u .
SFX 408 Y 15
SFX 408 0 a .
SFX 408 0 e .
SFX 408 0 ej .
SFX 408 0 eje .
SFX 408 0 eju .
SFX 408 0 ich .
SFX 408 0 im .
SFX 408 0 ima .
SFX 408 0 imi .
SFX 408 0 o .
SFX 408 0 og .
SFX 408 0 ogo .
SFX 408 0 om .
SFX 408 0 omu .
SFX 408 0 u .
SFX 409 Y 24
SFX 409 0 o .
SFX 409 0 og .
SFX 409 0 ogo .
SFX 409 0 ogokuli .
SFX 409 0 ogož .
SFX 409 0 ogožkuli .
SFX 409 0 om .
SFX 409 0 omej .
SFX 409 0 omkuli .
SFX 409 0 omu .
SFX 409 0 omukuli .
SFX 409 0 omuž .
SFX 409 0 omužkuli .
SFX 409 0 omy .
SFX 409 0 omž .
SFX 409 0 omžkuli .
SFX 409 0 otej .
SFX 409 0 ośo .
SFX 409 0 oš .
SFX 409 0 u .
SFX 409 0 ym .
SFX 409 0 ymkuli .
SFX 409 0 ymž .
SFX 409 0 ymžkuli .
SFX 410 Y 27
SFX 410 0 a .
SFX 410 0 ach .
SFX 410 0 achmej .
SFX 410 0 achmy .
SFX 410 0 achu .
SFX 410 0 am .
SFX 410 0 ami .
SFX 410 0 ašo .
SFX 410 0 aštej .
SFX 410 0 ašćo .
SFX 410 0 e .
SFX 410 0 eju .
SFX 410 0 i .
SFX 410 0 im .
SFX 410 0 imej .
SFX 410 0 imy .
SFX 410 0 itej .
SFX 410 0 iśo .
SFX 410 0 iš .
SFX 410 0 mej .
SFX 410 0 my .
SFX 410 0 oma .
SFX 410 0 ow .
SFX 410 0 owu .
SFX 410 0 tej .
SFX 410 0 u .
SFX 410 0 ćo .
SFX 411 Y 27
SFX 411 0 a .
SFX 411 0 ach .
SFX 411 0 achmej .
SFX 411 0 achmy .
SFX 411 0 achu .
SFX 411 0 am .
SFX 411 0 ami .
SFX 411 0 ašo .
SFX 411 0 aštej .
SFX 411 0 ašćo .
SFX 411 0 e .
SFX 411 0 eju .
SFX 411 0 i .
SFX 411 0 im .
SFX 411 0 imej .
SFX 411 0 imy .
SFX 411 0 itej .
SFX 411 0 iśo .
SFX 411 0 iš .
SFX 411 0 mej .
SFX 411 0 my .
SFX 411 0 oma .
SFX 411 0 ow .
SFX 411 0 owu .
SFX 411 0 tej .
SFX 411 0 u .
SFX 411 0 śo .
SFX 412 Y 6
SFX 412 0 ch .
SFX 412 0 chmej .
SFX 412 0 chmy .
SFX 412 0 chu .
SFX 412 0 štej .
SFX 412 0 šćo .
SFX 413 Y 15
SFX 413 0 a .
SFX 413 0 ach .
SFX 413 0 am .
SFX 413 0 ami .
SFX 413 0 e .
SFX 413 0 ej .
SFX 413 0 eje .
SFX 413 0 eju .
SFX 413 0 ow .
SFX 413 0 u .
SFX 413 0 y .
SFX 413 0 ych .
SFX 413 0 ym .
SFX 413 0 yma .
SFX 413 0 ymi .
SFX 414 Y 15
SFX 414 0 a .
SFX 414 0 ach .
SFX 414 0 am .
SFX 414 0 ami .
SFX 414 0 e .
SFX 414 0 mej .
SFX 414 0 my .
SFX 414 0 oju .
SFX 414 0 om .
SFX 414 0 oma .
SFX 414 0 ow .
SFX 414 0 owu .
SFX 414 0 tej .
SFX 414 0 u .
SFX 414 0 ćo .
SFX 415 Y 15
SFX 415 0 a .
SFX 415 0 ach .
SFX 415 0 am .
SFX 415 0 ami .
SFX 415 0 mej .
SFX 415 0 my .
SFX 415 0 oju .
SFX 415 0 om .
SFX 415 0 oma .
SFX 415 0 ow .
SFX 415 0 owu .
SFX 415 0 tej .
SFX 415 0 u .
SFX 415 0 y .
SFX 415 0 śo .
SFX 416 Y 13
SFX 416 0 a .
SFX 416 0 e .
SFX 416 0 ego .
SFX 416 0 ej .
SFX 416 0 eje .
SFX 416 0 eju .
SFX 416 0 em .
SFX 416 0 emu .
SFX 416 0 u .
SFX 416 0 ych .
SFX 416 0 ym .
SFX 416 0 yma .
SFX 416 0 ymi .
SFX 417 Y 16
SFX 417 0 a .
SFX 417 0 ach .
SFX 417 0 am .
SFX 417 0 ami .
SFX 417 0 mej .
SFX 417 0 my .
SFX 417 0 o .
SFX 417 0 oju .
SFX 417 0 om .
SFX 417 0 oma .
SFX 417 0 ow .
SFX 417 0 owu .
SFX 417 0 tej .
SFX 417 0 u .
SFX 417 0 y .
SFX 417 0 śo .
SFX 418 Y 14
SFX 418 0 a .
SFX 418 0 e .
SFX 418 0 ego .
SFX 418 0 ej .
SFX 418 0 eje .
SFX 418 0 eju .
SFX 418 0 em .
SFX 418 0 emu .
SFX 418 0 i .
SFX 418 0 u .
SFX 418 0 ych .
SFX 418 0 ym .
SFX 418 0 yma .
SFX 418 0 ymi .
SFX 419 Y 14
SFX 419 0 a .
SFX 419 0 e .
SFX 419 0 ego .
SFX 419 0 ej .
SFX 419 0 eje .
SFX 419 0 eju .
SFX 419 0 em .
SFX 419 0 emu .
SFX 419 0 u .
SFX 419 0 y .
SFX 419 0 ych .
SFX 419 0 ym .
SFX 419 0 yma .
SFX 419 0 ymi .
SFX 420 Y 14
SFX 420 0 a .
SFX 420 0 e .
SFX 420 0 ego .
SFX 420 0 ej .
SFX 420 0 eje .
SFX 420 0 eju .
SFX 420 0 em .
SFX 420 0 emu .
SFX 420 0 u .
SFX 420 0 y .
SFX 420 0 ych .
SFX 420 0 ym .
SFX 420 0 yma .
SFX 420 0 ymi .
SFX 421 Y 15
SFX 421 0 a .
SFX 421 0 e .
SFX 421 0 ego .
SFX 421 0 ej .
SFX 421 0 eje .
SFX 421 0 eju .
SFX 421 0 em .
SFX 421 0 emu .
SFX 421 0 i .
SFX 421 0 u .
SFX 421 0 y .
SFX 421 0 ych .
SFX 421 0 ym .
SFX 421 0 yma .
SFX 421 0 ymi .
SFX 422 Y 15
SFX 422 0 a .
SFX 422 0 e .
SFX 422 0 ego .
SFX 422 0 ej .
SFX 422 0 eje .
SFX 422 0 eju .
SFX 422 0 em .
SFX 422 0 emu .
SFX 422 0 o .
SFX 422 0 u .
SFX 422 0 y .
SFX 422 0 ych .
SFX 422 0 ym .
SFX 422 0 yma .
SFX 422 0 ymi .
SFX 423 Y 15
SFX 423 0 a .
SFX 423 0 e .
SFX 423 0 ego .
SFX 423 0 ej .
SFX 423 0 eje .
SFX 423 0 eju .
SFX 423 0 em .
SFX 423 0 emu .
SFX 423 0 o .
SFX 423 0 u .
SFX 423 0 y .
SFX 423 0 ych .
SFX 423 0 ym .
SFX 423 0 yma .
SFX 423 0 ymi .
SFX 424 Y 17
SFX 424 0 a .
SFX 424 0 ach .
SFX 424 0 am .
SFX 424 0 ami .
SFX 424 0 e .
SFX 424 0 m .
SFX 424 0 mej .
SFX 424 0 my .
SFX 424 0 oju .
SFX 424 0 om .
SFX 424 0 oma .
SFX 424 0 ow .
SFX 424 0 owu .
SFX 424 0 tej .
SFX 424 0 u .
SFX 424 0 śo .
SFX 424 0 š .
