ctranslate-ol/frontend/dictionaries/dsb_DE.dic
Carn/1,421
Lin/1,404
Pódmokł/1,413
Rown/1,418
Slěp/1,416
Sow/1,404
bogabójazn/1,421
bój/424
bójazn/1,421
běžn/1,421
błyskocuc/1,419
c/1,409
camp/417
cap/415
capotat/420
chórown/1,421
dognit/420
domown/1,421
dopokazn/1,421
dowiźon/1,419
dowuzdrjat/420
dowótpali/412
drasć/410
dłyp/415
gib/415
gnit/420
gnił/422
grim/415
gromadn/1,421
gryzkotajuc/1,419
głown/1,421
hamp/417
infracerwjen/1,421
jadnak/397
jězdn/1,421
kap/417
kejžorcyńš/1,419
kjawkat/420
kowaln/1,421
kósacn/1,421
kósn/1,421
kóńcowat/420
kšupn/1,419
lej/1,402
lip/417
maśeŕn/1,421
mjelcat/420
mój/408
nabubnaśeł/422
nabytš/1,419
nacerwjen/1,421
nadwój/397
nagnit/420
nagrima/412
nakisał/422
namokał/422
nanejdwójnjejš/1,419
nanejkuźeŕkatš/1,419
nanejnjezadłužońš/1,419
nanejrecyclingowš/1,419
nanejwenkowš/1,419
nanejśěgnjatš/1,419
nanejždurtonowš/1,419
nanejžkuprańš/1,419
nanejžnjewótpowědnjejš/1,419
nanejžradarnjejš/1,419
nanejžupnjejš/1,419
nanejžłapatš/1,419
nasyp/415
natśěgnu/412
natšojt/420
nazelen/1,421
nazym/1,404
nałam/415
naźej/1,402
nejcarnjejš/1,419
nejjězykowš/1,419
nejnawócnjejš/1,419
nejpósromnjejš/1,419
nejswójnjejš/1,419
nejzajěkotatš/1,419
nejžbźezwobmysliwš/1,419
nejžjuchtowš/1,419
nejžnaspomnjetš/1,419
nejžpómeblěrowańš/1,419
nejžsubstancowš/1,419
nejžwšogopśibytnjejš/1,419
nikak/397
njecasnikujuc/1,419
njechyl/403
njedograt/420
njedopódwórowa/412
njedowuzdrjat/420
njejadnak/397
njeklurnu/412
njekomponujuc/1,419
njemakat/420
njenapjepri/412
njenapojt/420
njenaźej/1,402
njenuŕnu/412
njepikał/422
njepowrět/420
njeprějobnjejš/1,419
njepójmat/420
njepókazy/412
njepówodni/412
njepózacut/420
njepśegrapsnu/412
njepśelat/420
njepśesłodcy/412
njepśewobut/420
njepśibasnjujuc/1,419
njepśijazn/1,421
njepśipali/412
njepśipóznat/420
njepśisłoź/401
njepśiłagoź/401
njeraź/401
njerozdźat/420
njerozkringeli/412
njeroznogaś/401
njerozzegnut/420
njeseś/410
njesformulowa/412
njeskal/403
njespokojnjec/1,419
njespśijaśeli/412
njesćět/420
njewjasel/411
njewobsca/412
njewobspomnjet/420
njewobźěl/403
njewowzet/420
njewołapa/412
njewudawujuc/1,419
njewukopśiwi/412
njewupócrět/420
njewuroni/412
njewuzagadowa/412
njewuzdrjał/422
njewuškrět/420
njewótbonowa/412
njewótetkat/420
njewótsćět/420
njewóttupi/412
njewótweznjon/1,419
njezagaśi/412
njezagnojt/420
njezapadnu/412
njezaprěł/422
njezatrět/420
njezałaśi/412
njezdrjał/422
njezegnut/420
njezespuchowa/412
njezminiměrowa/412
njezranliwš/1,419
njezrojt/420
njezwaźi/412
pasown/1,421
platśkotajuc/1,419
pokazn/1,421
powjesy/412
prochnjeł/422
pódkop/415
pódlětowat/420
pódwjacorn/1,421
pódzym/1,404
pógib/415
pógrim/415
pókisał/422
pókładn/1,421
pókłoni/412
póměr/398
pórědowš/1,419
póstoj/424
pówóstuźi/412
pózabyt/420
pěskown/1,421
płon/1,421
płošn/1,421
pśebywaln/1,421
pśechórjeł/422
pśedrozgron/399
pśejšł/1,423
pśekałnu/412
pśekisał/422
pśepsyt/420
pśewali/412
pśezdrjał/422
pśezpołdn/1,421
pśełam/415
pśełoźujuc/1,419
pśijazn/1,421
pśiklap/415
pśinalat/420
pśiraźi/412
pśisrěb/415
pśisłoź/401
pśiłagoź/401
raź/401
rown/1,421
rozkupujuc/1,419
rozkłon/398
rozlat/420
rozlubi/412
roznogaś/401
rědown/1,421
sanitarn/1,421
seś/410
skazy/412
składn/1,421
smaskotał/422
sodłat/420
spar/400
spaŕn/1,421
specialnjejš/1,419
sprochnjeł/422
sprěł/422
stergnu/412
stśěln/1,421
swój/408
tak/397
telik/397
traktorn/1,421
transcendentnjejš/1,419
tun/1,405
twój/407
tśap/415
tšojt/420
wjasel/411
wobbrunaśeł/422
wobdwór/398
wobgnił/422
wobstudnu/412
wobźěl/403
wokósćeł/422
wopak/397
wopit/420
wopšosćeł/422
wubrjažkowa/412
wugbał/422
wugib/415
wukop/415
wukśiknu/412
wuprochnjeł/422
wuprěł/422
wurěznu/412
wuspokojt/420
wutwarźon/1,419
wuzawalowa/412
wuzdrjał/422
wułam/415
wuźěrał/422
wóryjnjeł/422
wósłon/398
wótetkat/420
wótkop/415
wótwobrośi/412
wótłam/415
wótškrab/415
wěz/414
włožnit/420
wšak/397
zabywał/422
zadrap/415
zagib/415
zajtš/1,406
zakop/415
zakósćeł/422
zaprocesěrowa/412
zaprěł/422
zarub/415
zarzat/420
zazdrjał/422
zdrjał/422
zelkowatš/1,419
zesłapota/412
zewat/420
zešerjeł/422
zgib/415
zgnił/422
zrosł/422
zwobłamowa/412
zwódnjeł/422
zym/1,404
łoźown/1,421
šamp/417
škjarcat/420
šyj/1,402
žarjabn/1,421
žołśeł/422
žydnjeł/422
